Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.015

Purpose.

The aim and the purpose of Washington State University shall be to provide a higher education in such fields as may be established therein from time to time by the board of regents or by law, including instruction in agriculture or other industrial pursuits, mechanical arts and the natural sciences.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.015. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 243 s 1, part; RRS s 4568, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 190, part; 1891 c 145 s 1, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.015; 28.76.040, part and 28.76.050, part.]